North Dakota, session 69, HB1119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - CHILD CARE PROVIDER LICENSING.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall study the laws, administrative
rules, and policies relating to child care provider licensing.
2. If the legislative council conducts a program evaluation of the department of health and human
services child care services, the study must be informed by the program evaluation.
3. The study must include input from:
a. The department of health and human services;
b. The child care services advisory committee; and
c. Child care providers.
4. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM EVALUATION - DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - CHILD CARE SERVICES.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative council shall consider conducting a program
evaluation of the department of health and human services child care services.
2. The program evaluation must include:
a. Review and analysis of state and federal laws, administrative rules, and policies relating
to child care.
b. Evaluation of the child care services framework, identifying strengths, challenges, and
opportunities, including opportunities to streamline the administrative process, to
enhance clarity for providers, and to provide services for more children.
c. Consideration of licensing requirements, the federal and state assistance programs
available, education requirements for program operators, training and certification
requirements for staff members, the number of children in an early childhood program,
child to provider ratios, and square footage requirements.
d. Review and analysis of child care funding sources, expenditures, assistance penetration
rates, and the distribution of resources to determine whether the program efficiently and
effectively uses and distributes resources to support access to affordable and safe child
care.

H. B. NO. 1119 - PAGE 2
e. Review of recently enacted legislation regarding child care services to determine if the
policies have been timely implemented and properly administered, including an analysis
of measurable goals, performance data, and options to improve enrollment.
3. By August 1, 2026, the legislative council shall report its findings and recommendations to the
legislative management.
4. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 3. CHILD CARE SERVICES ADVISORY COMMITTEE - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AND HUMAN SERVICES.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of health and human services shall establish a
child care services advisory committee to review and provide input on the laws, administrative
rules, and the department of health and human services policies relating to child care
licensing.
2. The department of health and human services shall provide staffing and administrative
services for the child care services advisory committee.
3. The child care services advisory committee shall collaborate with the department of health and
human services to conduct a comprehensive revision of administrative rules relating to child
care licensing. In coordination with the committee, the department shall facilitate a series of
regional meetings and topical focus groups with child care providers from around the state to
discuss child care licensing challenges and review proposed revisions to the administrative
rules. The committee must have the opportunity to review and provide input on all of the
department's proposed administrative rule changes and policy changes relating to child care.
4. The advisory committee shall consist of:
a. Two child care center representatives, appointed by the legislative management;
b. Two group child care representatives, appointed by the legislative management;
c. Two preschool program representatives, appointed by the legislative management;
d. Two members of the house of representatives, selected by the majority leader of the
house of representatives;
e. Two members of the senate, selected by the majority leader of the senate; and
f. A child care expert, appointed by the legislative management.
5. The child care services advisory committee shall provide periodic status updates in
collaboration with the department of human services on proposed licensing rules and a final
report to the legislative management by June 30, 2026.
6. The child care services advisory committee shall dissolve after providing the final report to the
legislative management.

H. B. NO. 1119 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1119.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 11 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State